Washington statutes.
RCW 11.32.030

Powers and duties.

Such special administrator shall collect all the goods, chattels, money, effects, and debts of the deceased, and preserve the same for the personal representative who shall thereafter be appointed; and for that purpose may commence and maintain suits as an administrator, and may also sell such perishable and other goods as the court shall order sold, and make family allowances under the order of the court. The appointment may be for a specified time, to perform duties respecting specific property, or to perform particular acts, as stated in the order of appointment. Such special administrator shall be allowed such compensation for his or her services as the said court shall deem reasonable, together with reasonable fees for his or her attorney.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2027; 1965 c 145 s 11.32.030. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 83; RRS s 1453; prior: Code 1881 s 1421; 1863 p 222 s 139; 1860 p 185 s 106.]